Utah statutes.
53-8-211.5.   School bus safety standards -- Exceptions.
(1)  Beginning July 1, 2003, a school district or private school may not use a
vehicle with a seating capacity of 11 or more, including the driver, for the
transportation of its students unless the vehicle meets federal school bus
safety standards under 49 U.S.C. Sec. 30101, et seq.
(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply to a vehicle operated by a common carrier,
as defined in Section 59-12-102, if the common carrier is not exclusively
engaged in the transportation of students.
